Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-2119
Civil penalty authorized.

The Attorney General may seek a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each violation of the Membership Campground Act in the district court of Lancaster County. Each day of continued violation shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1990, LB 656, § 19.